Connecticut, session 2026, SB00141.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
seven hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by
the Department of Education for the purpose of providing a grant-in-
aid to Regional School District Number 8 to complete the installation of
a generator to create a regional shelter.